Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.370

Acquisition of control of association—Action or proceeding to prevent—Grounds.

The director may within thirty days after the date of filing of the application under RCW 33.24.360, file an action or proceeding in superior court to prevent the pending acquisition of control if the director finds any of the following:

(1) The acquisition would substantially lessen competition or would in any manner be in restraint of trade or would result in a monopoly, or would be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or to attempt to monopolize the savings and loan business in any part of the state of Washington, unless the director also finds that the anticompetitive effects of the proposed acquisition are clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the acquisition in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served;

(2) The poor financial condition of any acquiring party might jeopardize the financial stability of the association being acquired or might prejudice the interests of the depositors, borrowers, or stockholders of the association or is not in the public interest;

(3) The plan or proposal under which the acquiring party intends to liquidate the association, to sell its assets, or to merge it with any person or company, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure or management, is not fair and reasonable to the association's depositors, borrowers, or stockholders or is not in the public interest; or

(4) The competence, experience and integrity of any acquiring party who would control the operation of the association indicates that approval would not be in the interest of the association's depositors, borrowers, or stockholders nor in the public interest.

[ 1994 c 92 s 448; 1982 c 3 s 55; 1973 c 130 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.